Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 General Provisions

46-3-170.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

Cross references.

Nonprofit corporations generally, §

14-3-101

et seq.

Extension of jurisdiction of commission over electric membership corporations to same extent as commission has jurisdiction over electric light and power companies, §

46-3-12

.

46-3-171.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Address” means a complete mailing address, including, whenever practicable, street and number or building and floor.

“Articles of incorporation” means the original or restated articles of incorporation or articles of consolidation and all the amendments thereto, including articles of merger, and also includes what have been designated by the laws of this state prior to July 1, 1981, as charters.

(2.1)

“Broadband affiliate” means any person which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control of one or more electric membership corporations and which is used to provide broadband services.

(2.2)

“Broadband facilities” means any facilities and equipment utilized to provide or support broadband services.

(2.3)

“Broadband services” means a wired or wireless service that consists of the capability to transmit data at a rate not less than 200 kilobits per second to and from end users and in combination with such service provides:

(2.4)

“Communications service provider” means a provider of cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 522(6), telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153(53), or information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153(24), as each such term existed on January 1, 2019.

(2.5)

“Electric easement” means a right of way or an easement, whether acquired by eminent domain, prescription, or conveyance, that is used or may be used for transmitting, distributing, or providing electrical energy and services by utilizing aboveground or underground wires, cables, lines, or similar facilities.

Access to the internet;

Computer processing, information storage, or protocol conversion; or

Any application or information content to be provided over or through broadband.

Such term shall include any broadband facilities and equipment associated with providing such a service.

“Electric membership corporation” or “EMC” means an electric membership corporation organized under this article or any prior electric membership corporation law of this state, or a corporation which elected, in accordance with the provisions thereof, to be governed by Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, the “Electric Membership Corporation Act.”

“Federal agency” includes the United States of America and any department, administration, commission, board, bureau, office, establishment, agency, authority, or instrumentality thereof.

“Foreign electric cooperative” means a cooperative, nonprofit membership corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state for the same or similar purposes for which an electric membership corporation may be organized under this article.

(5.1)

“Gas activities” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 46-4-152.

(5.2)

“Gas affiliate” shall have the same meaning as the term “EMC gas affiliate” provided in Code Section 46-4-152.

“Insolvent” means that an electric membership corporation is unable to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its business or that it has liabilities in excess of assets.

“Member” means a person that has met the requirements and conditions of membership in an electric membership corporation which are set forth in this article and in the articles of incorporation and bylaws of an electric membership corporation.

“Person” includes any natural person; firm; association; electric membership corporation; cooperative; corporation; business or other trust; partnership; limited liability company; federal agency; state or political subdivision thereof; body politic; or other entity recognized by law.

(8.1)

“Retail broadband services” means any broadband services other than those provided for:

The internal use of an electric membership corporation;

The internal use of another electric membership corporation;

Resale by another electric membership corporation or other communications service providers; or

Use as a component part of communications services that other communications service providers offer to their customers.

“Service” means any service or commodity which an electric membership corporation may provide under this article for which value is paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 2; Ga. L. 1939, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 5, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 1/SB 2.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 26, 2019, added paragraphs (2.1) through (2.5), (5.1), (5.2), and (8.1); substituted “person that” for “person who” near the beginning of paragraph (7); and rewrote paragraph (8), which read: “ ‘Person’ includes any natural person; firm; association; electric membership corporation; foreign electric cooperative; corporation, either domestic or foreign; business or other trust; partnership; federal agency; state or political subdivision thereof; or body politic.”

46-3-172.
Applicability of article.

This article shall apply to electric membership corporations but shall not apply to other persons except when expressly so provided in this article.

This article shall apply to commerce with foreign nations and among the several states only insofar as the same may be permitted under the Constitution and laws of the United States.

This article shall not impair the existence of any electric membership corporation existing on July 1, 1981. Any such existing electric membership corporation and its members, directors, and officers shall have the same rights and be subject to the same limitations, restrictions, liabilities, and penalties as an electric membership corporation formed under this article and its members, directors, and officers.

If the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of an electric membership corporation in existence on July 1, 1981, contain any provisions which were not authorized or permitted by the prior electric membership corporation law of this state but which are authorized or permitted by this article, such articles of incorporation or bylaw provisions shall be valid on and from July 1, 1981; and action may be taken on and from that date in reliance on such provisions.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-103, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-173.
Effect of affixing corporate seal; signing of documents; affixing of seal as optional; signing of deeds after dissolution of an electric membership corporation.

With respect to any contract, conveyance, or other such document executed by and on behalf of an electric membership corporation or a foreign electric cooperative, the presence of the corporate seal or facsimile thereof, attested by the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, shall attest:

That the corporate seal or facsimile thereof affixed to the document is in fact the seal of the corporation or a true facsimile thereof, as the case may be;

That any officer of the corporation executing the document does in fact occupy the official position indicated; that one in such position is duly authorized to execute such document on behalf of the corporation; and that the signature of such officer subscribed thereto is genuine; and

That the execution of the document on behalf of the corporation has been duly authorized.

When the seal of an electric membership corporation or facsimile thereof is affixed to any document and is attested by the secretary or an assistant secretary of an electric membership corporation, a third party without knowledge or reason to know to the contrary may rely on such document as being what it purports to be.

When other provisions of this article require a document to be executed as provided in this Code section, the document shall be signed by the president or other chief executive officer, or a vice-president; and his signature shall be attested by the secretary or an assistant secretary. If the corporate seal is affixed, the signature of the secretary or assistant secretary shall also attest the seal.

The seal of the electric membership corporation may, but need not, be affixed to any document executed in accordance with this article; and its absence therefrom shall not impair the validity of the document or of any action taken in pursuance thereof or in reliance thereon.

Deeds or other transfer instruments requiring execution after the dissolution of an electric membership corporation may be signed by any two of the last officers or directors of the electric membership corporation and shall operate to convey the interest of the electric membership corporation in the real estate or other property described.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-174.
Filing of documents with Secretary of State; filing of articles of correction.

Whenever this article requires any document to be delivered for filing as provided in this article, unless otherwise specifically stated in this article and subject to any additional provisions of this article, such requirement shall mean that:

The original executed document, together with a conformed copy thereof, shall be delivered to the office of the Secretary of State;

All fees required for filing the document shall be tendered to the Secretary of State;

Upon delivery of the documents, and upon tender of the required fees, the Secretary of State shall certify that the original has been filed in his office by endorsing upon the original the word “filed” and the hour, day, month, and year thereof. Such endorsement shall be known as the filing date of the document and shall be conclusive of the date of filing in the absence of actual fraud. The Secretary of State shall thereafter file and index the original;

The Secretary of State shall immediately compare the conformed copy with the original; and, if he finds that they are identical, he shall certify the conformed copy by making upon it the same endorsement which is required to appear upon the original, together with a further endorsement that the conformed copy is a true copy of the original document;

The conformed copy, so certified, shall be returned to the person or persons delivering the documents to the Secretary of State or to the designee of such person or persons; and it shall be retained as part of the permanent records of the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative.

Whenever any document authorized to be filed with the Secretary of State under this article has been so filed and contains errors in, inaccuracies in, or omissions of information required by this article, is an inaccurate record of the action therein referred to, or was defectively or erroneously executed or sealed, such document may be corrected by filing articles of correction with the Secretary of State. The articles of correction shall specify the error, inaccuracy, omission, or defect to be corrected and shall set forth the portion of the document in corrected form. Except as set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section, the procedure for filing articles of correction shall be the same as would be required under this article for filing the document being corrected. The corrected document shall be effective as of the effective date of the original document, except as to those persons who are substantially and adversely affected by the correction; and, as to those persons, the corrected document shall be effective from the filing date of the articles of correction.

No fee shall be payable to the Secretary of State for filing the articles of correction. The filing of the articles of correction as authorized in subsection (b) of this Code section shall not require the republication of any notice previously published in connection with the filing of the original document unless the error, inaccuracy, omission, or defect in the original document relates to information which was disclosed in the notice. In the event the error, inaccuracy, omission, or defect in the original document relates to information disclosed in the notice, a new notice shall be published in the same manner as the original publication. The publisher’s fee for republication shall be the same as the fee for the original publication.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-105, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-175.
Certification of documents by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State, at any time, upon the request of any person, shall make and certify additional copies of any document filed with his or her office and of the certificate, if any, issued by the Secretary of State in connection with the filing of the document, under this article, upon payment to the Secretary of State of the fee provided for in Code Section 46-3-502.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-106, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 90/HB 24.

The 2011 amendment,

effective January 1, 2013, deleted former subsection (a); deleted the former subsection (b) designation; inserted “or her” near the middle of this Code section; and substituted “the Secretary of State” for “him” near the end of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

46-3-176.
Obligations issued to secure payment of federal loans as constituting securities; exemption of obligations and membership certificates from Georgia securities laws.

Whenever any electric membership corporation shall have borrowed money from any federal agency, the obligations issued to secure the payment of such money shall be and are classified as securities, the inherent qualities of which assure their sale and disposition without the perpetuation of fraud and which, together with membership certificates issued by any such electric membership corporation, shall not be subject to the Georgia securities laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 20; Code 1933, § 34C-1801, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-177.
Jurisdiction of commission.

Except as otherwise provided in Part 1 of Article 1 of this chapter, the “Georgia Territorial Electric Service Act,” electric membership corporations shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1802, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-178.
Intent of article as regards authority of electric membership corporations to own or operate cable television systems.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that nothing in this article shall be construed so as to authorize any electric membership corporation to own or operate a cable television system.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 2.

46-3-179.
Validity of transactions entered into before July 1, 1981; preservation of rights, duties, and interests arising from such transactions.

Transactions validly entered into before July 1, 1981, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them shall remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute repealed by this article as though such repeal had not occurred.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 3.

46-3-180.
Effect of article on cause of action, liability, penalty, or special proceeding accrued, existing, incurred, or pending as of July 1, 1981.

The repeal of a prior Act by this article shall not affect any cause of action, liability, penalty, or action or special proceeding which is accrued, existing, incurred, or pending on July 1, 1981; but the same may be asserted, enforced, prosecuted, or defended as if the prior Act had not been repealed.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 4.

46-3-181.
Reservation of power by General Assembly.

The General Assembly shall at all times have power to prescribe such regulations, provisions, and limitations as it may deem advisable, which regulations, provisions, and limitations shall be binding upon any and all persons which are subject to this article; and the General Assembly shall have power to amend, repeal, or modify this article at pleasure.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-107, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-182.
Construction of article as against Part 1 of Article 1 of this chapter, the “Georgia Territorial Electric Service Act.”

Nothing in this article repeals, or is intended to repeal, either expressly or by implication, any provision of Part 1 of Article 1 of this chapter, the “Georgia Territorial Electric Service Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.